Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1006
Nebraska Safety Center; purposes and functions.

The purposes and functions of the center shall include (1) instruction, to provide educational courses and coordinated activities relating to all safety and safety education, (2) research, to provide leadership in identifying priorities of safety education and to provide expertise in safety research projects, (3) service, to provide information and workshop opportunities to all interested individuals, and (4) coordination, to provide articulation for development of a statewide system of teacher preparation in safety education programs.

Laws 1978, LB 693, § 6.